Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Nurse Licensure Compact

§ 1647. Section 1647 effective February 1, 2022. Nurse Licensure Compact; adoption.

This subchapter is the Vermont adoption of the Nurse Licensure Compact as amended by the National Council of State Boards of Nursing. The form, format, and text of the Compact have been conformed to the conventions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. It is the intent of the General Assembly that this subchapter be interpreted as substantively the same as the Nurse Licensure Compact that is enacted by other Compact party states.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647a. Section 1647a effective February 1, 2022. Findings and declaration of purpose.

The party states find that:

The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws.

Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public.

The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies as part of our nation’s health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation.

New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws difficult and complex.

The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states.

Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout the states promotes public safety and public health benefits.

The general purposes of this Compact are to:

Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s health and safety.

Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation.

Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of nurse regulation, investigation, and adverse actions.

Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each jurisdiction.

Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses.

Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses.

Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647b. Section 1647b effective February 1, 2022. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws that is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure privilege, such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse’s authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.

“Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board.

“Commission” means the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.

“Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated process for collecting, storing, and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards.

“Current significant investigative information” means:

investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or

investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.

“Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board.

“Home state” means the party state that is the nurse’s primary state of residence.

“Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible for issuing nurse licenses.

“Multistate license” means a license to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or a licensed practical or vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege.

“Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either an RN or LPN/VN in a remote state.

“Nurse” means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined by each party state’s practice laws.

“Party state” means any state that has adopted this Compact.

“Remote state” means a party state other than the home state.

“Single-state license” means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state.

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States and the District of Columbia.

“State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules, and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. “State practice laws” do not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647c. Section 1647c effective February 1, 2022. General provisions and jurisdiction.

A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical or vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a nurse to practice as an RN or LPN/VN, under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.

A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.

Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state:

meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure as well as all other applicable state laws;

has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN pre-licensure education program; or
(2) (A) has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN pre-licensure education program; or

has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN pre-licensure education program that has been:

approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country; and

verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing board-approved pre-licensure education program;

has, if a graduate of a foreign pre-licensure education program not taught in English or if English is not the individual’s native language, successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing, and listening;

has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN or NCLEX-PN Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;

is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;

has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records;

has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law;

has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis;

is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;

is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an alternative program; and

has a valid U.S. Social Security number.

All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege, such as revocation, suspension, probation, or any other action that affects a nurse’s authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states.

A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts, and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.

Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state’s single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the single-state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.

Any nurse holding a home state multistate license on the effective date of this Compact may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse’s then-current home state, provided that:

A nurse who changes primary state of residence after this Compact’s effective date must meet all applicable requirements of subsection (c) of this section to obtain a multistate license from a new home state.

A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in subsection (c) of this section due to a disqualifying event occurring after this Compact’s effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse’s multistate license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647d. Section 1647d effective February 1, 2022. Applications for licensure in a party state.

Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program.

A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one party state at a time.

If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Commission.

The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence.

A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state.

If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a non-party state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647e. Section 1647e effective February 1, 2022. Additional authority invested in party state licensing boards.

In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to:

Take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state.

Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse’s license issued by the home state.

For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.

Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse’s authority to practice within that party state.

Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence during the course of such investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions.

Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence is located.

Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal background checks, and use the results in making licensure decisions.

If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse.

Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.

If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse’s multistate license, the nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a nurse’s multistate license shall include a statement that the nurse’s multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order.

Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state’s decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse’s participation in an alternative program.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647f. Section 1647f effective February 1, 2022. Coordinated licensure information system.

All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all licensed RNs and LPNs/VNs. This system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts.

The Commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection, and exchange of information under this Compact.

All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, current significant investigative information, denials of applications with the reasons for such denials, and nurse participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law.

Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that may not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state.

Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information.

Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system.

The Compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the Compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:

identifying information;

licensure data;

information related to alternative program participation; and

other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact, as determined by Commission rules.

The Compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647g. Section 1647g effective February 1, 2022. Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators; establishment.

The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.

The Commission is an instrumentality of the party states.

Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction, where the principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.

Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Membership, voting, and meetings.

Each party state shall have and be limited to one administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this Compact for each party state. Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists.

Each administrator shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an administrator’s participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.

The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the Commission.

All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 1647h of this chapter.

The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the Commission must discuss:

noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this Compact;

the employment, compensation, discipline, or other personnel matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;

current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;

negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services, or real estate;

accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;

disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;

disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this Compact; or

matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute.

If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this Compact, including, but not limited to:

Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission.

Providing reasonable standards and procedures:

for the establishment and meetings of other committees; and

governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the Commission.

Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings, and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public’s interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting, revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed.

Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the Commission.

Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the Commission.

Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the Commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this Compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations.

The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of the Commission.

The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.

The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.

The Commission shall have the following powers:

To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states.

To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected.

To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.

To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations.

To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including, but not limited to, sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space, or other resources.

To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, and grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact and to establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters.

To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants, and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services and to receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest.

To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use any property, whether real, personal, or mixed, provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety.

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal, or mixed.

To establish a budget and make expenditures.

To borrow money.

To appoint committees, including advisory committees composed of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer representatives, and other such interested persons.

To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies.

To adopt and use an official seal.

To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice.

Financing of the Commission.

The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

The Commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities, and staff in its annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states.

The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state.

The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.

Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.

The administrators, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person.

The Commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel, and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct.

The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647h. Section 1647h effective February 1, 2022. Rulemaking.

The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this Compact.

Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.

Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the Commission, and at least 60 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:

on the website of the Commission; and

on the website of each licensing board or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.

The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

the proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;

the text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;

a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and

the manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.

Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.

The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.

The Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing.

Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this section.

If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.

Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.

The Commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;

prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or

meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule.

The Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.